Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2457.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 40, chapter 2, article 6.2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 40-360.14, to read: START_STATUTE40-360.14. Exemption; new plants colocated with extra high load factor customers Notwithstanding sections 40-360.03 and 40-360.07, a utility, after providing thirty days' written notice to the commission and holding at least one public comment session in the county where the relevant plant is located, may construct a new plant without filing for or receiving a certificate of environmental compatibility for the new plant if all of the following conditions are met: 1. The new plant is colocated with an extra high load factor customer and the extra high load factor customer has received all applicable zoning entitlements. 2. The utility is a public service corporation or public power entity doing business in this state. END_STATUTE